Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Jail Construction Authority
441.695.
Reports of authority — Audits — Authority’s audits to be public records.

By January 1 each year the authority shall make an annual report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the Office of the State Budget Director and to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year. The authority shall provide for an audit of its books and accounts to be made within ninety (90) days after the close of each fiscal year by certified public accountants and the cost thereof may be treated as a part of the cost of construction of the project. Such audits shall be public records within the meaning of KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 235, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 344, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2002, ch. 183, § 29, effective August 1, 2002.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1687.

Research References and Practice Aids

2020-2022 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Pt. I, H, 5, c, (2) at 1102.